Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 13. Foresters.

§ 10.1-1181.8.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Forester”
means any person who is engaged in the science, profession and practice of forestry and who possesses the qualifications required by this article.

“Forestry”
means the science, art and practice of creating, managing, using and conserving forests and associated natural resources for human benefit and in a sustainable manner to meet desired goals, needs, and values.

History.

2002, c. 447.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Forester.” —

Absent a specific definition in the Dam Safety Act, it is appropriate to look to the definition of the term “forester” provided in the statutes governing the Department of Forestry as an interpretative guide, and that a forester differs from an orchardist in that an orchardist harvests fruit, nuts or sap from trees, while a forester is concerned with the timber itself. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas C. Wright, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 12-074, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/13).

§ 10.1-1181.9.
Requirements for forester title.

In order to use the title of forester in connection with any practice of forestry, the person shall (i) hold a baccalaureate or higher degree from a public or private institution of higher education, having completed a degree program that (a) is accredited by the Society of American Foresters (the Society) and (b) meets the minimum education criteria set forth by the Society in the fields of forest ecology and biology, management of forest resources, and forest resources policy and administration or (ii) have met the educational criteria for Certified Forester as reviewed and officially recognized in writing by the Society.

No person shall be appointed by the Governor to serve as State Forester unless he meets the requirements of clause (i) of subsection A.

History.

2002, c. 447; 2019, c. 158.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “an institution of higher education” was substituted for “a college or university” in text of this section to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 158 designated the existing provisions as subsection A and added subsection B; rewrote subsection A, which read: “In order to use the title of forester in connection with any practice of forestry, the person shall hold a baccalaureate or higher degree from an institution of higher education curriculum accredited by the Society of American Foresters and such degree curriculum shall meet the minimum education criterion set forth by the Society in the fields of forest ecology and biology, management of forest resources, and forest resources policy and administration.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-580. Deed of Conservation Easement for Forest Lands.

§ 10.1-1181.10.
Activities not prohibited.

The provisions of this article shall not prohibit:

Any person from performing forestry functions and services so long as he does not represent himself to the public as a forester;

An employee or subordinate of a forester from performing forestry functions and services; or

The practice of any profession or occupation that is regulated by a regulatory board within the Department of Professional and Occupational Regulation or other state agency.

History.

2002, c. 447.

§ 10.1-1181.11.
Injunctive relief.

The Attorney General or any other person may apply to the circuit court in a jurisdiction where venue is proper for injunctive relief to restrain a person who has violated the provisions of this article.

History.

2002, c. 447.

§ 10.1-1181.12.
Exemption from article.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any person who supplies the Department of Forestry with information or documentation showing that such person was actively engaged in the practice of forestry for a continuous period of at least ten years prior to July 1, 2002. The Department shall maintain and make available to the public a list of all persons who satisfy the requirements of this section.

History.

2002, c. 447.